apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
    <pardef n="/ser__vbser">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>seríem</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fórem</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>seria</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fóra</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>seríeu</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fóreu</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>series</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fores</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>serien</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>foren</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>seria</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fóra</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>serem</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>seré</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sereu</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>seràs</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>seran</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>serà</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>fóssim</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>fos</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>fóssiu</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>fossis</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>fossin</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>fos</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sent</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>essent</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sent</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>essent</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fórem</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fui</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fóreu</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fores</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>foren</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>fou</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>siguem</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>siguem</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sigueu</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sigueu</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sigues</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sigues</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>siguin</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>siguen</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>siguin</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>siguen</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>sigui</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>siga</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>sigui</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>siga</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ser</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ser</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>érem</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>era</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éreu</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eres</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eren</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>era</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>fóssim</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>fórem</l> 
        <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>fos</l> 

<e lm="ser"><par n="/ser__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="ser conforme" a="prompsit"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>conforme</l><r><g><b/>conforme</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser aplicable" r="RL"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>aplicable</l><r><g><b/>aplicable</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser a punt" a="prompsit"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>punt</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>punt</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser a càrrec" r="RL"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>càrrec</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>càrrec</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ser igual" a="prompsit2uoc"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>igual</l><r><g><b/>igual</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser a temps" a="mireiafarrus"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>temps</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>temps</g></r></p></e>
